Tennessee, session 114, HB0523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall conduct a study and prepare a report on recommendations regarding alternative
measures to the additional registration fee imposed on all-electric vehicles, hybrid
electric vehicles, and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 55-4-116, to replace or supplement the decreases in transportation
infrastructure funding due to vehicles becoming more fuel efficient or using no fuel.
(b) The study and report must:
(1) Provide transportation user fee alternatives;
(2) Identify the benefits and challenges of various transportation user fee
options; and
(3) Survey alternative user fee programs successfully implemented over
the past ten (10) years by at least three (3) other states.
(c) All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).
(d) On or before January 1, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, regarding transportation user fee
alternatives to the chair of the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction
HB0523
000742
- 1 -

over transportation issues, the chair of the transportation and safety committee of the
senate, and the legislative librarian.
(e) It is the legislative intent that this study must be conducted from TACIR's
existing resources.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000742